Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.070

ESD board—Members—Restriction on other service.

No person shall serve as an employee of a school district or as a member of a board of directors of a common school district or as a member of the state board of education and as a member of an educational service district board at the same time.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 8; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.21.0306.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.